Washington statutes.
RCW 36.100.050

Ad valorem property tax.

(1) A public facilities district may levy an ad valorem property tax, in excess of the one percent limitation, upon the property within the district for a one-year period to be used for operating or capital purposes whenever authorized by the voters of the district pursuant to RCW 84.52.052 and Article VII, section 2(a) of the state Constitution.

(2) A public facilities district may provide for the retirement of voter-approved general obligation bonds, issued for capital purposes only, by levying bond retirement ad valorem property tax levies, in excess of the one percent limitation, whenever authorized by the voters of the district pursuant to Article VII, section 2(b) of the state Constitution and RCW 84.52.056.

[ 1988 ex.s. c 1 s 15.]